Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1.1. Medical Care Facilities Certificate of Public Need.
§ 32.1-102.4.
Conditions of certificates; monitoring; revocation of certificates; civil penalties.

The Commissioner may, in accordance with regulations of the Board, condition issuance of a certificate on compliance with a schedule for the completion of the proposed project and a maximum capital expenditure amount for the proposed project. The approved schedule and maximum capital expenditure for a proposed project shall be issued together with the certificate. The approved schedule may not be extended and the maximum capital expenditure may not be exceeded without the approval of the Commissioner in accordance with the regulations of the Board. The Commissioner shall not approve an extension for a schedule for completion of any project or the exceeding of the maximum capital expenditure of any project unless such extension or excess complies with the limitations provided in the regulations promulgated by the Board pursuant to §

32.1-102.2

.The Commissioner shall monitor each project to determine its progress and compliance with the approved schedule and with the maximum capital expenditure, and may revoke the certificate for (i) lack of substantial and continuing progress toward completion of the project in accordance with the schedule or (ii) expenditures in excess of the approved maximum capital expenditure for the project.Any person willfully violating conditions imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $100 per violation per day until the date of completion of the project which shall be collected by the Commissioner and paid into the Literary Fund.For the purposes of this subsection, “completion” means conclusion of construction activities necessary for the substantial performance of the contract.

The Commissioner shall, pursuant to the regulations of the Board, condition the approval of a certificate upon the agreement of the applicant to provide care to individuals who are eligible for benefits under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.), Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), and 10 U.S.C. § 1071 et seq. In addition, the Commissioner shall condition the approval of a certificate upon the agreement of the applicant to (i) provide a specified level of charity care to indigent persons or accept patients requiring specialized care, (ii) facilitate the development and operation of primary and specialty medical care services in designated medically underserved areas of the applicant’s service area, or (iii) all of the above. Except in the case of nursing homes, the value of charity care provided to individuals pursuant to this subsection shall be based on the provider reimbursement methodology utilized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.Every certificate holder shall develop a financial assistance policy that includes specific eligibility criteria and procedures for applying for charity care, which shall be provided to a patient at the time of admission or discharge or at the time services are provided, included with any billing statements sent to uninsured patients, posted conspicuously in public areas of the medical care facility for which the certificate was issued and posted on a website maintained by the certificate holder.The certificate holder shall annually provide documentation to the Department demonstrating that the certificate holder has satisfied the conditions of the certificate, including documentation of the amount of charity care provided to patients. If the certificate holder is unable or fails to satisfy the conditions of a certificate, the Department may approve alternative methods to satisfy the conditions pursuant to a plan of compliance, which shall identify a timeframe within which the certificate holder will satisfy the conditions of the certificate, and identify how the certificate holder will satisfy the conditions of the certificate, which may include (a) making direct payments to an organization authorized under a memorandum of understanding with the Department to receive contributions satisfying conditions of a certificate, (b) making direct payments to a private nonprofit foundation that funds basic insurance coverage for indigents authorized under a memorandum of understanding with the Department to receive contributions satisfying conditions of a certificate, or (c) other documented efforts or initiatives to provide primary or specialized care to underserved populations. In cases in which the certificate holder holds more than one certificate with conditions pursuant to this subsection, and the certificate holder is unable to satisfy the conditions of one certificate, such plan of compliance may provide for satisfaction of the conditions on that certificate by providing care at a reduced rate to indigent individuals in excess of the amount required by another certificate issued to the same holder, in an amount approved by the Department provided such care is offered at the same facility. Nothing in the preceding sentence shall prohibit the satisfaction of conditions of more than one certificate among various affiliated facilities or certificates subject to a system-wide or all-inclusive charity care condition established by the Commissioner. In determining whether the certificate holder has met the conditions of the certificate pursuant to a plan of compliance, only such actions undertaken after issuance of the conditioned certificate shall be counted towards satisfaction of conditions.Any person refusing, failing, or neglecting to honor such agreement shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $100 per violation per day until the date of compliance which shall be collected by the Commissioner and paid into the Literary Fund. For the purpose of determining the amount of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection, the date on which the person began providing services in accordance with the original certificate shall be the date from which the period of noncompliance shall be calculated.

The Commissioner shall (i) review every certificate of public need upon which conditions were imposed pursuant to subsection B at least once every three years to determine whether such conditions continue to be appropriate or should be revised and (ii) notify each certificate holder of his conclusions regarding (a) the appropriateness of conditions imposed on the certificate and whether such conditions should be revised and (b) the process by which the certificate holder may request amendments to conditions imposed on a certificate in accordance with subsection D.

Pursuant to regulations of the Board, the Commissioner may accept requests for and approve amendments to conditions of existing certificates related to the provision of care at reduced rates or to patients requiring specialized care or related to the development and operation of primary medical care services in designated medically underserved areas of the certificate holder’s service area.

In determining whether conditions imposed on a certificate of public need pursuant to subsection B are appropriate for the purposes of subsection C or should be amended in response to a request submitted pursuant to subsection D, the Commissioner shall consider any changes in the circumstances of the certificate holder resulting from changes in the financing or delivery of health care services, including changes to the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance services, and any other specific circumstances of the certificate holder.

History.

1982, c. 388; 1991, c. 561; 1992, c. 682; 1993, cc. 668, 704; 1998, c. 794; 2009, cc. 175, 711, 796, 877; 2013, c. 460; 2017, cc. 768, 791; 2019, c. 839; 2020, c. 1271.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 460, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2013, c. 460, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Health, in consultation with the Virginia Department of Veterans Services, Virginia Health Information Exchange, Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, and other industry stakeholders shall review the provisions of §

32.1-102.4

as amended by this act as well as the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, related to the Commissioner’s imposition of conditions on certificates of public need. The workgroup shall consider the potential impacts of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act on Virginia’s uninsured population and certificate holders’ ongoing ability to meet their conditions. The workgroup shall also consider expanding the categories of patients whose care may be included in conditions on certificates, including disabled veterans with service-related injuries, patients receiving services under the state plan for medical assistance, and others.”

Acts 2017, c. 791, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Health shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Education and Health by November 1, 2018, a data analysis comparing the value of (i) the total amount of charity care as defined in §

32.1-102.1

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, that each medical care facility provided to indigent persons; (ii) the number of patients to whom charity care was provided; (iii) the specific services delivered to patients that are reported as charity care recipients; and (iv) the portion of the total amount of charity care provided that each service represents to comply with any conditions on such certificates based on the method utilized for valuing such care as of July 1, 2017, to the medical care facility’s cost using a method established by the nonprofit organization defined in §

32.1-276.3

of the Code of Virginia and to the value of such care based on the provider reimbursement methodology utilized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.”

Acts 2017, c. 791, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §§

32.1-102.2

and

32.1-102.4

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289,
Item 300 H, as added by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The provisions of §

32.1-102.4

(B), Code of Virginia, shall not apply to nursing homes.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 175, 711, 796 and 877 are identical, and added the second paragraph in subsection F. The amendments by Acts 2009, c. 175, became effective March 25, 2005.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 460 added subsection G and redesignated former subsection G as subsection H.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 768 inserted the fourth and fifth sentences in the second paragraph of subsection F.

The 2017 amendment by c. 791, effective July 1, 2019, in subsection F, substituted “charity care to indigent persons” for “care at a reduced rate to indigents” and added the second sentence in the first paragraph, inserted “including documentation of the amount of charity care provided to patients” in the second paragraph and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 839 added subsection G; redesignated former subsections G and H as H and I, respectively; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in health care law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 199 (2002).

§ 32.1-102.5.
Certificate not transferable.

No certificate issued for a project shall be transferable.

History.

1982, c. 388.

§ 32.1-102.6.
Administrative procedures.

To obtain a certificate for a project, the applicant shall file a completed application for a certificate with the Department and the appropriate regional health planning agency if a regional health planning agency has been designated for that region. Such application shall be filed in accordance with procedures established by the Department. An application submitted for review shall be considered complete when all relevant sections of the application form have responses. The applicant shall provide sufficient information to prove public need for the requested project exists without the addition of supplemental or supporting material at a later date. The Department shall ensure that only data necessary for review of an application is required to be submitted and that the application reflects statutory requirements. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Department from seeking, at its discretion, additional information from the applicant or other sources.Within 10 calendar days of the date on which the document is received, the Department and the appropriate regional health planning agency, if a regional health planning agency has been designated, shall determine whether the application is complete or not and the Department shall notify the applicant, if the application is not complete, of the information needed to complete the application. If no regional health planning agency is designated for the health planning region in which the project will be located, no filing with a regional health planning agency is required and the Department shall determine if the application is complete and notify the applicant, if the application is not complete, of the information needed to complete the application.At least 30 calendar days before any person is contractually obligated to acquire an existing medical care facility, the cost of which is $600,000 or more, that person shall notify the Commissioner and the appropriate regional health planning agency, if a regional health planning agency has been designated, of the intent, the services to be offered in the facility, the bed capacity in the facility and the projected impact that the cost of the acquisition will have upon the charges for services to be provided. If clinical services or beds are proposed to be added as a result of the acquisition, the Commissioner may require the proposed new owner to obtain a certificate prior to the acquisition. If no regional health planning agency is designated for the health planning region in which the acquisition will take place, no notification to a regional health planning agency shall be required.

For projects proposed in health planning regions with regional planning agencies, the appropriate regional health planning agency shall (i) review each completed application for a certificate within 60 calendar days of the day that begins the appropriate batch review cycle as established by the Board by regulation pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

32.1-102.2

, such cycle not to exceed 190 days in duration; (ii) within 10 calendar days following the start of the review cycle, solicit public comment on such application by posting notice of such application and a summary of the proposed project on a website maintained by the Department; such notice shall include information about how comments may be submitted to the regional health planning agency and the date on which the public comment period shall expire, which shall be no later than 45 calendar days following the date of the public notice; and (iii) in the case of competing applications or in response to a written request by an elected local government representative, a member of the General Assembly, the Commissioner, the applicant, or a member of the public, hold one public hearing on each application in a location in the county or city in which the project is proposed or a contiguous county or city. Prior to any required public hearing, the regional health planning agency shall notify the local governing bodies in the planning district. At least nine days prior to the public hearing, the regional health planning agency shall cause notice of the public hearing to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city where the project is proposed to be located. The regional health planning agency shall consider the comments of the local governing bodies in the planning district and all other public comments in making its decision. Such comments shall be part of the record. In no case shall a regional health planning agency hold more than two meetings on any application, one of which shall be the public hearing required pursuant to clause (iii), if any, conducted by the board of the regional health planning agency or a subcommittee of the board. The applicant shall be given the opportunity, prior to the vote by the board of the regional health planning agency or a committee of the agency, if acting for the board, on its recommendation, to respond to any comments made about the project by the regional health planning agency staff, any information in a regional health planning agency staff report, or comments by those voting members of the regional health planning agency board; however, such opportunity shall not increase the 60-calendar-day period designated herein for the regional health planning agency’s review unless the applicant or applicants request a specific extension of the regional health planning agency’s review period.The regional health planning agency shall submit its recommendations on each application and its reasons therefor to the Department within 10 calendar days after the completion of its 60-calendar-day review or such other period in accordance with the applicant’s request for extension.If the regional health planning agency has not completed its review within the specified 60 calendar days or such other period in accordance with the applicant’s request for extension and submitted its recommendations on the application and the reasons therefor within 10 calendar days after the completion of its review, the Department shall, on the eleventh calendar day after the expiration of the regional health planning agency’s review period, proceed as though the regional health planning agency has recommended project approval without conditions or revision.If no regional health planning agency has been designated for a region, the Department shall (a) within 10 calendar days following the start of the review cycle, solicit public comment on such application by posting notice of such application and a summary of the proposed project on a website maintained by the Department; such notice shall include such information about how comments may be submitted to the Department and the date on which the public comment period shall expire, which shall be no later than 45 calendar days following the date of the public notice, and (b) in the case of competing applications or in response to a written request by an elected local government representative, a member of the General Assembly, the Commissioner, the applicant, or a member of the public, hold one hearing on each application in a location in the county or city in which the project is proposed or a contiguous county or city. Prior to any required hearing, the Department shall notify the local governing bodies in the planning district in which the project is proposed. At least nine days prior to the public hearing, the Department shall cause notice of the public hearing to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city where the project is proposed to be located. The Department shall consider the comments of the local governing bodies in the planning district and all other public comments in making its decision. Such comments shall be part of the record.

After commencement of any public hearing and before a decision is made there shall be no ex parte contacts concerning the subject certificate or its application between (i) any person acting on behalf of the applicant or holder of a certificate or any person opposed to the issuance or in favor of revocation of a certificate of public need and (ii) any person in the Department who has authority to make a determination respecting the issuance or revocation of a certificate of public need, unless the Department has provided advance notice to all parties referred to in clause (i) of the time and place of such proposed contact.

The Department shall commence the review of each completed application upon the day which begins the appropriate batch review cycle and simultaneously with the review conducted by the regional health planning agency, if a regional health planning agency has been designated.A determination whether a public need exists for a project shall be made by the Commissioner within 190 calendar days of the day which begins the appropriate batch cycle.The 190-calendar-day review period shall begin on the date upon which the application is determined to be complete within the batching process specified in subdivision A 1 of §

32.1-102.2

.If the application is not determined to be complete within 40 calendar days from submission, the application shall be refiled in the next batch for like projects.The Commissioner shall make determinations in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) except for those parts of the determination process for which timelines and specifications are delineated in subsection E. Further, if an informal fact-finding conference is determined to be necessary by the Department or is requested by a person seeking good cause standing, the parties to the case shall include only the applicant, any person showing good cause, any third-party payor providing health care insurance or prepaid coverage to five percent or more of the patients in the applicant’s service area, and the relevant health planning agency.

Upon entry of each completed application or applications into the appropriate batch review cycle:

The Department shall establish, for every application, a date between the eightieth and ninetieth calendar days within the 190-calendar-day review period for holding an informal fact-finding conference, if such conference is necessary.

The Department shall review every application at or before the seventy-fifth calendar day within the 190-calendar-day review period to determine whether an informal fact-finding conference is necessary.

Any person seeking to be made a party to the case for good cause, no later than four days after the Department has completed its review and submitted its recommendation on an application and has transmitted the same to the applicants and to persons who have, prior to the issuance of the report, requested a copy in writing, shall notify the Commissioner, all applicants, and the regional health planning agency, in writing and under oath, stating the grounds for good cause and providing the factual basis therefor.

In any case in which an informal fact-finding conference is held, a date shall be established for the closing of the record which shall not be more than 30 calendar days after the date for holding the informal fact-finding conference.

In any case in which an informal fact-finding conference is not held, the record shall be closed on the earlier of (i) the date established for holding the informal fact-finding conference or (ii) the date that the Department determines an informal fact-finding conference is not necessary.

The provisions of subsection C of §

2.2-4021

notwithstanding, if a determination whether a public need exists for a project is not made by the Commissioner within 45 calendar days of the closing of the record, the Commissioner shall notify the applicant or applicants and any persons seeking to show good cause, in writing, that the application or the application of each shall be deemed approved 25 calendar days after expiration of such 45-calendar-day period, unless the receipt of recommendations from the person performing the hearing officer functions permits the Commissioner to issue his case decision within that 25-calendar-day period. The validity or timeliness of the aforementioned notice shall not, in any event, prevent, delay or otherwise impact the effectiveness of this section.

In any case when a determination whether a public need exists for a project is not made by the Commissioner within 70 calendar days after the closing of the record, the application shall be deemed to be approved and the certificate shall be granted.

If a determination whether a public need exists for a project is not made by the Commissioner within 45 calendar days of the closing of the record, any applicant who is competing in the relevant batch or who has filed an application in response to the relevant Request For Applications issued pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:2

may, prior to the application being deemed approved, petition for immediate injunctive relief pursuant to §

2.2-4030

, naming as respondents the Commissioner and all parties to the case. During the pendency of the proceeding, no applications shall be deemed to be approved. In such a proceeding, the provisions of §

2.2-4030

shall apply.

Deemed approvals shall be construed as the Commissioner’s case decision on the application pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and shall be subject to judicial review on appeal as the Commissioner’s case decision in accordance with such act.Any person who has sought to participate in the Department’s review of such deemed-to-be-approved application as a person showing good cause who has not received a final determination from the Commissioner concerning such attempt to show good cause shall be deemed to be a person showing good cause for purposes of appeal of the deemed approval of the certificate.In any appeal of the Commissioner’s case decision granting a certificate of public need pursuant to a Request for Applications issued pursuant to §

32.1-102.3:2

, the court may require the appellant to file a bond pursuant to §

8.01-676.1

, in such sum as shall be fixed by the court for protection of all parties interested in the case decision, conditioned on the payment of all damages and costs incurred in consequence of such appeal.

For purposes of this section, “good cause” means that (i) there is significant relevant information not previously presented at and not available at the time of the public hearing, (ii) there have been significant changes in factors or circumstances relating to the application subsequent to the public hearing, or (iii) there is a substantial material mistake of fact or law in the Department staff’s report on the application or in the report submitted by the health planning agency.

The project review procedures shall provide for separation of the project review manager functions from the hearing officer functions. No person serving in the role of project review manager shall serve as a hearing officer.

The applicants, and only the applicants, shall have the authority to extend any of the time periods specified in this section. If all applicants consent to extending any time period in this section, the Commissioner, with the concurrence of the applicants, shall establish a new schedule for the remaining time periods.

This section shall not apply to applications for certificates for projects defined in subdivision A 8 of §

32.1-102.1:3

. Such projects shall be subject to an expedited application and review process developed by the Board in regulation pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

32.1-102.2

.

History.

1982, c. 388; 1984, c. 740; 1991, c. 561; 1999, cc. 899, 922; 2000, c. 931; 2004, cc. 71, 95; 2005, c. 404; 2009, c. 175; 2010, c. 646; 2020, c. 1271.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 931 rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 71 and 95 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “10” for “ten” in the second paragraph and substituted “30” for “thirty” in the first sentence of the last paragraph; in subsection B, in the first paragraph, substituted “60” for “sixty” in the first sentence, inserted the fourth through sixth sentences, and substituted “60” for “sixty” in the last sentence, substituted “10” for “ten” in the second paragraph, and substituted “60” for “sixty” and “10” for “ten” in the third paragraph; substituted “40” for “forty” in the fourth paragraph of subsection D; substituted “30” for “thirty” in subdivision E 4; in subdivision E 6, substituted “45” for “forty-five” and “25” for “twenty-five” in two places in the first sentence; substituted “70” for “seventy” in subdivision E 7; and substituted “45” for “forty-five” in the first sentence of subdivision E 8.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 404, in the last paragraph of subsection D, inserted “if an informal fact-finding conference is determined to be necessary by the Department or is requested by a person seeking good cause standing” and “relevant,” substituted “and” for “or,” and deleted “if its recommendation was to deny the application.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, inserted “regional” preceding “health planning” throughout the section; in subsection A, inserted “electronically” preceding “by certified mail” in the first paragraph, added the last sentence in the second paragraph, and added the last sentence in the last paragraph; in subsection B, inserted “For projects proposed in health planning regions with regional planning agencies” in the first sentence, inserted “or the Department if no regional health planning agency is designated” in the second, third and fourth sentences, inserted the sixth sentence, deleted “provided to the Department” at the end of the seventh sentence, and in the last sentence, inserted “regional health planning agency” and “members of the regional health planning agency board,” and added the last sentence in the last paragraph; substituted “this section” for “subdivision E 6 of §

32.1-102.6

” in the last sentence of subdivision E 6; and added subsection J.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 646, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, inserted “if a regional health planning agency has been designated for that region”; in subsection A, in the second and third paragraphs and in subsection D, inserted “if a regional health planning agency has been designated”; and in subsection B, rewrote the first paragraph; in the third paragraph, deleted the last sentence, which read: “If no regional health planning agency has been designated, recommendations and reasons therefore submitted by a health planning agency shall be reviewed by the Commissioner as public comment,” and added the last paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271, in subsection A in the first paragraph, substituted the second through the sixth sentences for the second sentence, which read: “In order to verify the date of the Department’s and the appropriate regional health planning agency’s receipt of the application, the applicant shall transmit the document electronically, by certified mail or a delivery service, return receipt requested, or shall deliver the document by hand, with signed receipt to be provided”; in the first paragraph of subsection B, inserted clause (ii), added “in the case of competing applications or in response to a written request by an elected local government representative, a member of the General Assembly, the Commissioner, the applicant, or a member of the public” in clause (iii), substituted “any required public hearing” for “the public hearing” in the second sentence, and inserted “required pursuant to clause (iii), if any” in the sixth sentence; in the fourth paragraph of subsection B, inserted clause (a), added “in the case of competing applications . . . or a member of the public” in clause (b), and substituted “any required hearing” for “the hearing” in the second sentence; in subsection C, substituted “in clause (i)” for “in (i)”; in subsection D, last paragraph, first sentence, deleted “of this section” at the end; rewrote subdivision E 3, which read: “Any person seeking to be made a party to the case for good cause shall notify the Department of his request and the basis therefor on or before the eightieth calendar day following the day which begins the appropriate batch review cycle”; updated a reference; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia health law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 853 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 3.

§ 32.1-102.6:1.
Revocation of a certificate.

The Commissioner shall revoke a certificate of public need for:

Failure to comply with the requirements of subsection A of §

32.1-102.4

regarding schedules for completion of a project or maximum capital expenditures for a project; or

Willfully or recklessly misrepresented intentions or facts in obtaining a certificate.

History.

2020, c. 1271.

§ 32.1-102.7.
Repealed by Acts 1984, c. 740.

§ 32.1-102.8.
Enjoining project undertaken without certificate or registration.

On petition of the Commissioner, the Board or the Attorney General, the circuit court of the county or city where a project is under construction or is intended to be constructed, located, or undertaken shall have jurisdiction to enjoin any project that is constructed, undertaken, or commenced without a certificate or registration required by this article or to enjoin the admission of patients to the project or to enjoin the provision of services through the project.

History.

1982, c. 388; 2020, c. 1271.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271 inserted “or registration required by this article” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey on evidence in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 647 (1989).

§ 32.1-102.9.
Designation of judge.

The judge of the court to which any appeal is taken as provided in §

32.1-102.6

and the judge of the court referred to in §

32.1-102.8

shall be designated by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court from a circuit other than the circuit where the project is or will be under construction, located or undertaken.

History.

1982, c. 388; 1984, c. 740.

§ 32.1-102.10.
Commencing project without certificate or registration grounds for refusing to issue license.

Commencing any project without a certificate or registration required by this article shall constitute grounds for refusing to issue a license for such project. Persons commencing any project without a certificate or registration as required by this article shall be subject to the penalties set forth in §§

32.1-27

and

32.1-27.1

.

History.

1982, c. 388; 2009, c. 175; 2020, c. 1271.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271 inserted “or registration” in both sentences.